Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.080

Homestead exemption, when not available.

The homestead exemption is not available against an execution or forced sale in satisfaction of judgments obtained:

(1) On debts secured by mechanic's, laborer's, construction, maritime, automobile repair, material supplier's, or vendor's liens arising out of and against the particular property claimed as a homestead;

(2) On debts secured:

(a) By security agreements describing as collateral the property that is claimed as a homestead; or

(b) By mortgages or deeds of trust on the premises that have been executed and acknowledged by both spouses or both domestic partners or by any claimant not married or in a state registered domestic partnership. The execution and acknowledgment of a mortgage or deed of trust by a dependent who is not a spouse or domestic partner is not required;

(3) On one spouse's or one domestic partner's or the community's debts existing at the time of that spouse's or that domestic partner's bankruptcy filing where (a) bankruptcy is filed by both spouses or both domestic partners within a six-month period, other than in a joint case or a case in which their assets are jointly administered, and (b) the other spouse or other domestic partner exempts property from property of the estate under the bankruptcy exemption provisions of 11 U.S.C. Sec. 522(d);

(4) On debts arising from a lawful court order or decree or administrative order establishing a child support obligation or obligation to pay maintenance;

(5) On debts owing to the state of Washington for recovery of medical assistance correctly paid on behalf of an individual consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p;

(6) On debts secured by a condominium, homeowners', or common interest community association's lien; or

(7) On debts owed for taxes collected under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW but not remitted to the department of revenue.

[ 2021 c 290 s 6; 2019 c 238 s 215; 2018 c 277 s 501; 2013 c 23 s 2; 2008 c 6 s 635; 2007 c 429 s 2; 2005 c 292 s 4; 1993 c 200 s 4. Prior: 1988 c 231 s 3; 1988 c 192 s 1; 1987 c 442 s 208; 1984 c 260 s 16; 1982 c 10 s 1; prior: 1981 c 304 s 17; 1981 c 149 s 1; 1909 c 44 s 1; 1895 c 64 s 5; RRS s 533. Formerly RCW 6.12.100.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2021 c 290: See notes following RCW 6.13.010.

Effective date—2018 c 277: See RCW 64.90.910.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Severability—1982 c 10: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 10 s 19.]

Severability—1981 c 304: See note following RCW 26.16.030.